Nebraska, session 109, LB383.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 28-1463.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-1463.01 Sections 1 to 6 of this act 28-1463.01 to 28-1463.06 shall be
known and may be cited as the Child Sexual Abuse Material Child Pornography
Prevention Act.
Sec. 2. Section 28-1463.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-1463.02 As used in the Child Sexual Abuse Material Pornography
Prevention Act, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Child , in the case of a participant, means an individual any person
under the age of eighteen years other than the defendant and, in the case of a
portrayed observer, means any person under the age of sixteen years;
(2) Child sexual abuse material means any visual depiction of sexually
explicit conduct that:
(a) Depicts a child as a participant or portrayed observer, regardless of
whether the visual depiction is obscene;
(b) Depicts a person with identifiable physical features of a child as a
participant or portrayed observer, regardless of whether the visual depiction
is obscene; or
(c) Is obscene and depicts a person or a computer-generated person as a
participant or portrayed observer, and such person:
(i) Is a child;
(ii) Would appear to a reasonable person to be a child; or
(iii) Is depicted with physical features of a child;
(3) Computer-generated means that a visual depiction has been created,
adapted, or modified by using a computer, digital program or process,
artificial intelligence, or any similar device or means;
(4) Computer-generated person means a computer-generated image that
appears to depict a human being, or a human being whose image has been morphed,
altered, or modified, whether or not that human being exists or existed in the
natural world;
(5)(a) Conviction or convicted includes a plea or verdict of guilty or a
conviction following a plea of nolo contendere.
(b) Conviction or convicted includes a conviction that has been set aside
under section 29-2264.
(c) Conviction or convicted does not include a conviction for which a
pardon has been obtained;
(6) Covered offense means a violation of section 28-308, 28-309, 28-310,
28-311, 28-313, 28-314, 28-315, 28-319, 28-319.01, 28-320.01, 28-833, or
section 3, 4, or 5 of this act, or subsection (1) or (2) of section 28-320;
(7) Electronic communication device has the same meaning as in section
28-833;
(8) (2) Erotic fondling means touching a person's clothed or unclothed
genitals or pubic area, breasts if the person is a female, or developing breast
area if the person is a female child, for the purpose of real or simulated
overt sexual gratification or sexual stimulation of one or more persons
involved. Erotic fondling shall not be construed to include physical contact,
even if affectionate, which is not for the purpose of real or simulated overt
sexual gratification or sexual stimulation of one or more of the persons
involved;
(9) (3) Erotic nudity means the display of the human male or female
genitals or pubic area, the human female breasts, or the developing breast area
of the human female child, for the purpose of real or simulated overt sexual
gratification or sexual stimulation of one or more of the persons involved in
-1-

LB383 LB383
2025 2025
the visual depiction or for the sexual gratification or stimulation of the
viewer;
(10) Obscene has the same meaning as in section 28-807;
(11) Person, with respect to the subject of a visual depiction, includes
an actual person or any visual depiction that appears to be such person or an
actual person whose image has been morphed, altered, or modified;
(12) (4) Sadomasochistic abuse means flagellation or torture by or upon a
nude person or a person clad in undergarments, a mask, or bizarre costume, or
the condition of being fettered, bound, or otherwise physically restrained when
performed to predominantly appeal to the morbid interest;
(13) (5) Sexually explicit conduct means: (a) Real or simulated
intercourse, whether genital-genital, oral-genital, anal-genital, or oral-anal
between persons of the same or opposite sex or between a human and an animal or
with an artificial genital; (b) real or simulated masturbation; (c) real or
simulated sadomasochistic abuse; (d) erotic fondling; (e) erotic nudity; or (f)
real or simulated defecation or urination for the purpose of sexual
gratification or sexual stimulation of one or more of the persons involved; and
(14) (6) Visual depiction means live performance or photographic
representation, whether of actual persons or events, computer-generated persons
or events, or any combination thereof, and includes any undeveloped film or
videotape or data stored on a computer disk or by other electronic means which
is capable of conversion into a visual image and also includes any photograph,
film, video, picture, digital image, or computer-displayed image, video, or
picture, whether made, or produced, morphed, altered, or modified by
electronic, mechanical, computer-generated, computer, digital, or other means.
Sec. 3. Section 28-813.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
28-813.01 (1) It shall be unlawful for a person nineteen years of age or
older to knowingly possess or receive any child sexual abuse material visual
depiction of sexually explicit conduct which has a child as one of its
participants or portrayed observers. Violation of this subsection is a Class
IIA felony.
(2)(a) (2) It shall be unlawful for a person under nineteen years of age
to knowingly and intentionally possess or receive any child sexual abuse
material visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct which has a child other
than the defendant as one of its participants or portrayed observers.
(b) Violation of this subsection is a Class I misdemeanor. A second or
subsequent conviction under this subsection is a Class IV felony.
(3) For a defendant who was eighteen years of age or older but under
nineteen years of age at the time of the offense, it It shall be an affirmative
defense to a charge made pursuant to subsection (2) of this section that:
(a)(i) The defendant was less than nineteen years of age;
(a) The visual depiction:
(i) Portrays (ii) the visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct
portrays a child who is fifteen years of age or older;
(ii) Was (iii) the visual depiction was knowingly and voluntarily
generated by the child depicted therein;
(iii) Was (iv) the visual depiction was knowingly and voluntarily provided
by such the child depicted in the visual depiction; and
(iv) Portrays (v) the visual depiction contains only one child other than
the defendant;
(b) The (vi) the defendant has not provided or made available the visual
depiction to another person except such the child depicted who originally sent
the visual depiction to the defendant; and
(c) The (vii) the defendant did not coerce such the child in the visual
depiction to either create or send the visual depiction. ; or
(4) For a defendant who was under eighteen years of age at the time of the
offense, it shall be an affirmative defense to a charge made pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section that:
(b)(i) The defendant was less than eighteen years of age;
(a) The (ii) the difference in age between the defendant and the child
portrayed is less than four years;
(b) The visual depiction:
(i) Was (iii) the visual depiction was knowingly and voluntarily generated
by the child depicted therein;
(ii) Was (iv) the visual depiction was knowingly and voluntarily provided
by such the child depicted in the visual depiction; and
(iii) Portrays (v) the visual depiction contains only one child other than
the defendant;
(c) The (vi) the defendant has not provided or made available the visual
depiction to another person except such the child depicted who originally sent
the visual depiction to the defendant; and
(d) The (vii) the defendant did not coerce such the child in the visual
depiction to either create or send the visual depiction.
(5) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(b) of this section, any (4) Any
person who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section and who has
previously been convicted of a covered offense violation of this section or
section 28-308, 28-309, 28-310, 28-311, 28-313, 28-314, 28-315, 28-319,
28-319.01, 28-320.01, 28-833, 28-1463.03, or 28-1463.05 or subsection (1) or
(2) of section 28-320 shall be guilty of a Class IC felony for each offense.
(5) In addition to the penalties provided in this section, a sentencing
court may order that any money, securities, negotiable instruments, firearms,
conveyances, or electronic communication devices as defined in section 28-833
-2-

LB383 LB383
2025 2025
or any equipment, components, peripherals, software, hardware, or accessories
related to electronic communication devices be forfeited as a part of the
sentence imposed if it finds by clear and convincing evidence adduced at a
separate hearing in the same prosecution, conducted pursuant to section
28-1601, that any or all such property was derived from, used, or intended to
be used to facilitate a violation of this section.
(6) The definitions in section 28-1463.02 shall apply to this section.
Sec. 4. Section 28-1463.05, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
28-1463.05 (1) It shall be unlawful for a person to knowingly possess with
intent to rent, sell, deliver, distribute, trade, or provide to any person any
child sexual abuse material visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct which
has a child other than the defendant as one of its participants or portrayed
observers.
(2)(a) Any person who is under nineteen years of age at the time he or she
violates this section shall be guilty of a Class IIIA felony for each offense.
(b) Any person who is nineteen years of age or older at the time he or she
violates this section shall be guilty of a Class II IIA felony for each
offense.
(c) Any person who violates this section and who has previously been
convicted of a covered offense violation of this section or section 28-308,
28-309, 28-310, 28-311, 28-313, 28-314, 28-315, 28-319, 28-319.01, 28-320.01,
28-813, 28-833, or 28-1463.03 or subsection (1) or (2) of section 28-320 shall
be guilty of a Class IC felony for each offense.
Sec. 5. Section 28-1463.03, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
28-1463.03 (1) It shall be unlawful for a person to knowingly make,
publish, direct, create, provide, or in any manner generate any child sexual
abuse material visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct which has a child
other than the defendant as one of its participants or portrayed observers.
(2) It shall be unlawful for a person knowingly to purchase, rent, sell,
deliver, distribute, display for sale, advertise, trade, publish, circulate, or
provide to any person any child sexual abuse material visual depiction of
sexually explicit conduct which has a child other than the defendant as one of
its participants or portrayed observers.
(3) It shall be unlawful for a person to knowingly employ, force,
authorize, induce, or otherwise cause a child to appear or be depicted in any
child sexual abuse material engage in any visual depiction of sexually explicit
conduct which has a child as one of its participants or portrayed observers.
(4) It shall be unlawful for a parent, stepparent, legal guardian, or any
person with custody and control of a child, knowing the content thereof, to
consent to such child appearing or being depicted in any child sexual abuse
material engaging in any visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct which
has a child as one of its participants or portrayed observers.
(5) For a defendant who was eighteen years of age or older but under
nineteen years of age at the time of the offense, it shall be an affirmative
defense to a charge made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section that:
(a) The visual depiction:
(i) Portrays a child who is fifteen years of age or older;
(ii) Was knowingly and voluntarily generated by the child depicted
therein;
(iii) Was knowingly and voluntarily provided by such child; and
(iv) Portrays only one child other than the defendant;
(b) The defendant has not provided or made available the visual depiction
to another person except such child; and
(c) The defendant did not coerce such child to either create or send the
visual depiction.
(6) For a defendant who was under eighteen years of age at the time of the
offense, it shall be an affirmative defense to a charge made pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section that:
(a) The difference in age between the defendant and the child portrayed is
less than four years;
(b) The visual depiction:
(i) Was knowingly and voluntarily generated by the child depicted therein;
(ii) Was knowingly and voluntarily provided by such child; and
(iii) Portrays only one child other than the defendant;
(c) The defendant has not provided or made available the visual depiction
to another person except such child; and
(d) The defendant did not coerce such child to either create or send the
visual depiction.
(7) Any person who is under nineteen years of age at the time he or she
violates this section shall be guilty of a Class III felony for each offense.
(8) Any person who is nineteen years of age or older at the time he or she
violates this section shall be guilty of a Class ID felony for each offense.
(9) Any person who violates this section and who has previously been
convicted of a covered offense shall be guilty of a Class IC felony for each
offense.
Sec. 6. Section 28-1463.06, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-1463.06 In addition to the penalties provided in the Child Sexual Abuse
Material Child Pornography Prevention Act, a sentencing court may order
forfeiture as provided in sections 28-1601 to 28-1603. that any money,
securities, negotiable instruments, firearms, conveyances, or electronic
-3-

LB383 LB383
2025 2025
communication devices as defined in section 28-833 or any equipment,
components, peripherals, software, hardware, or accessories related to
electronic communication devices be forfeited as a part of the sentence imposed
if it finds by clear and convincing evidence adduced at a separate hearing in
the same prosecution, conducted pursuant to section 28-1601, that any or all
such property was derived from, used, or intended to be used to facilitate a
violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act.
Sec. 7. Section 25-21,291, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
25-21,291 For purposes of the Exploited Children's Civil Remedy Act:
(1) Access software provider means a provider of software, including
client or server software, or enabling tools that do any one or more of the
following: (a) Filter, screen, allow, or disallow content; (b) pick, choose,
analyze, or digest content; or (c) transmit, receive, display, forward, cache,
search, subset, organize, reorganize, or translate content;
(2) Aid or assist another with the creation, distribution, or active
acquisition of child sexual abuse material child pornography means help a
principal in some appreciable manner with the creation, distribution, or active
acquisition of a visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct which has a
child as one of its participants or portrayed observers. The term also includes
knowingly employing, forcing, authorizing, inducing, or otherwise causing a
child to engage in any visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct which has
a child as one of its participants or portrayed observers. No parent,
stepparent, legal guardian, or person with custody and control of a child,
knowing the content thereof, may consent to such child engaging in any visual
depiction of sexually explicit conduct which has a child as one of its
participants or portrayed observers;
(3) Cable operator means any person or group of persons (a) who provides
cable service over a cable system and directly or through one or more
affiliates owns a significant interest in such cable system or (b) who
otherwise controls or is responsible for, through any arrangement, the
management and operation of such a cable system;
(4) Child has the same meaning as in section 2 of this act 28-1463.02;
(5) Create means to knowingly create, make, manufacture, direct, publish,
finance, or in any manner generate;
(6) Distribute means the actual, constructive, or attempted transfer from
one person, source, or location to another person, source, or location. The
term includes, but is not limited to, renting, selling, delivering, displaying,
advertising, trading, mailing, procuring, circulating, lending, exhibiting,
transmitting, transmuting, transferring, disseminating, presenting, or
providing any visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct which has a child
as one of its participants or portrayed observers;
(7) Interactive computer service means any information service system or
access software provider that provides or enables computer access by multiple
users to a computer server, including specifically a service or system that
provides access to the Internet and such systems operated or services offered
by libraries or educational institutions;
(8) Participant means a child who appears in any visual depiction of
sexually explicit conduct and is portrayed or actively engaged in acts of
sexually explicit conduct appearing therein;
(9) Portrayed observer means a child who appears in any visual depiction
where sexually explicit conduct is likewise portrayed or occurring within the
child's presence or in the child's proximity;
(10) Sexually explicit conduct has the same meaning as in section 2 of
this act 28-1463.02;
(11) Telecommunications service means the offering of telecommunications
for a fee directly to the public, or to such classes of users as to be
effectively available directly to the public, regardless of the facilities
used; and
(12) Visual depiction has the same meaning as in section 2 of this act
28-1463.02.
Sec. 8. Section 25-21,302, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
25-21,302 (1)(a) In addition to any other civil or criminal penalties
provided by law, any property used in the commission of a violation of the
Child Sexual Abuse Material Child Pornography Prevention Act or section 28-813,
28-831, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107 may be
forfeited through a proceeding as provided in this section.
(b) The following property shall be subject to forfeiture if used or
intended for use as an instrumentality in or used in furtherance of a violation
of the Child Sexual Abuse Material Child Pornography Prevention Act or section
28-813, 28-831, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107:
(i) Conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles, or vessels;
(ii) Books, records, telecommunication equipment, or computers;
(iii) Money or weapons;
(iv) Everything of value furnished, or intended to be furnished, in
exchange for an act in violation and all proceeds traceable to the exchange;
(v) Negotiable instruments and securities;
(vi) Any property, real or personal, directly or indirectly acquired or
received in a violation or as an inducement to violate;
(vii) Any property traceable to proceeds from a violation; and
(viii) Any real property, including any right, title, and interest in the
whole of or any part of any lot or tract of land, used in furtherance of a
-4-

LB383 LB383
2025 2025
violation of the Child Sexual Abuse Material Child Pornography Prevention Act
or section 28-813, 28-831, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or
28-1107.
(c)(i) No property used by any person as a common carrier in the
transaction of business as a common carrier is subject to forfeiture under this
section unless it appears that the owner or other person in charge of the
property is a consenting party or privy to a violation of the Child Sexual
Abuse Material Child Pornography Prevention Act or section 28-813, 28-831,
28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107.
(ii) No property is subject to forfeiture under this section by reason of
any act or omission proved by the owner thereof to have been committed or
omitted without his or her actual knowledge or consent. If the confiscating
authority has reason to believe that the property is leased or rented property,
then the confiscating authority shall notify the owner of the property within
five days after the confiscation or within five days after forming reason to
believe that the property is leased or rented property.
(iii) Forfeiture of property encumbered by a bona fide security interest
is subject to the interest of the secured party if such party neither had
actual knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission.
(2) No property shall be forfeited under this section, to the extent of
the interest of an owner, by reason of any act or omission established by the
owner to have been committed or omitted without his or her actual knowledge or
consent.
(3) Seizure without process may be made if the seizure is incident to an
arrest or a search under a search warrant.
(4)(a) When any property is seized under this section, proceedings shall
be instituted within a reasonable period of time from the date of seizure or
the subject property shall be immediately returned to the party from whom
seized.
(b) A petition for forfeiture shall be filed by the Attorney General or a
county attorney in the name of the State of Nebraska and may be filed in the
county in which the seizure is made, the county in which the criminal
prosecution is brought, or the county in which the owner of the seized property
is found. Forfeiture proceedings may be brought in the district court or the
county court. A copy of the petition shall be served upon the following persons
by service of process in the same manner as in civil cases:
(i) The owner of the property if the owner's address is known;
(ii) Any secured party who has registered a lien or filed a financing
statement as provided by law if the identity of the secured party can be
ascertained by the entity filing the petition by making a good faith effort to
ascertain the identity of the secured party;
(iii) Any other bona fide lienholder or secured party or other person
holding an interest in the property in the nature of a security interest of
whom the seizing law enforcement agency has actual knowledge; and
(iv) Any person in possession of property subject to forfeiture at the
time that it was seized.
(5) If the property is a motor vehicle subject to titling under the Motor
Vehicle Certificate of Title Act or a vessel subject to titling under the State
Boat Act, and if there is any reasonable cause to believe that the motor
vehicle or vessel has been titled, inquiry of the Department of Motor Vehicles
shall be made as to what the records of the department show as to who is the
record owner of the motor vehicle or vessel and who, if anyone, holds any lien
or security interest that affects the motor vehicle or vessel.
(6) If the property is a motor vehicle or vessel and is not titled in the
State of Nebraska, then an attempt shall be made to ascertain the name and
address of the person in whose name the motor vehicle or vessel is licensed,
and if the motor vehicle or vessel is licensed in a state which has in effect a
certificate of title law, inquiry of the appropriate agency of that state shall
be made as to what the records of the agency show as to who is the record owner
of the motor vehicle or vessel and who, if anyone, holds any lien, security
interest, or other instrument in the nature of a security device that affects
the motor vehicle or vessel.
(7) If the property is of a nature that a financing statement is required
by the laws of this state to be filed to perfect a security interest affecting
the property and if there is any reasonable cause to believe that a financing
statement covering the security interest has been filed under the laws of this
state, inquiry shall be made as to what the records show as to who is the
record owner of the property and who, if anyone, has filed a financing
statement affecting the property.
(8) If the property is an aircraft or part thereof and if there is any
reasonable cause to believe that an instrument in the nature of a security
device affects the property, inquiry shall be made as to what the records of
the Federal Aviation Administration show as to who is the record owner of the
property and who, if anyone, holds an instrument in the nature of a security
device which affects the property.
(9) If the answer to an inquiry states that the record owner of the
property is any person other than the person who was in possession of it when
it was seized or states that any person holds any lien, encumbrance, security
interest, other interest in the nature of a security interest, mortgage, or
deed of trust that affects the property, the record owner and also any
lienholder, secured party, other person who holds an interest in the property
in the nature of a security interest, or holder of an encumbrance, mortgage, or
deed of trust that affects the property is to be named in the petition of
-5-

LB383 LB383
2025 2025
forfeiture and is to be served with process in the same manner as in civil
cases.
(10) If the owner of the property cannot be found and served with a copy
of the petition of forfeiture or if no person was in possession of the property
subject to forfeiture at the time that it was seized and the owner of the
property is unknown, there shall be filed with the clerk of the court in which
the proceeding is pending an affidavit to such effect, whereupon the clerk of
the court shall publish notice of the hearing addressed to "the Unknown Owner
of ............," filling in the blank space with a reasonably detailed
description of the property subject to forfeiture. Service by publication shall
be completed in the same manner as is provided in the code of civil procedure
for the service of process in civil actions in the district courts of this
state.
(11) No proceedings instituted pursuant to this section shall proceed to
hearing unless the judge conducting the hearing is satisfied that this section
has been complied with. Any answer received from an inquiry required by this
section shall be introduced into evidence at the hearing.
(12)(a) An owner of property that has been seized shall file an answer
within thirty days after the completion of service of process. If an answer is
not filed, the court shall hear evidence that the property is subject to
forfeiture and forfeit the property to the seizing law enforcement agency. If
an answer is filed, a time for hearing on forfeiture shall be set within thirty
days after filing the answer or at the succeeding term of court if court would
not be in session within thirty days after filing the answer. The court may
postpone the forfeiture hearing to a date past the time any criminal action is
pending against the owner upon request of any party.
(b) If the owner of the property has filed an answer denying that the
property is subject to forfeiture, then the burden is on the petitioner to
prove that the property is subject to forfeiture. However, if an answer has not
been filed by the owner of the property, the petition for forfeiture may be
introduced into evidence and is prima facie evidence that the property is
subject to forfeiture. The burden of proof placed upon the petitioner in regard
to property forfeited under this section shall be by clear and convincing
evidence.
(c) At the hearing any claimant of any right, title, or interest in the
property may prove his or her lien, encumbrance, security interest, other
interest in the nature of a security interest, mortgage, or deed of trust to be
bona fide and created without actual knowledge or consent that the property was
to be used so as to cause the property to be subject to forfeiture.
(d) If it is found that the property is subject to forfeiture, then the
judge shall forfeit the property. However, if proof at the hearing discloses
that the interest of any bona fide lienholder, any secured party, any other
person holding an interest in the property in the nature of a security
interest, or any holder of a bona fide encumbrance, mortgage, or deed of trust
is greater than or equal to the present value of the property, the court shall
order the property released to him or her. If the interest is less than the
present value of the property and if the proof shows that the property is
subject to forfeiture, the court shall order the property forfeited.
(13) Unless otherwise provided in this section, all personal property
which is forfeited under this section shall be liquidated and, after deduction
of court costs and the expense of liquidation, the proceeds shall be remitted
to the county treasurer of the county in which the seizure was made. The county
treasurer shall remit all such proceeds from property forfeited pursuant to
this section to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article
VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
(14) All money forfeited under this section shall be remitted in the same
manner as provided in subsection (13) of this section.
(15) All real estate forfeited under this section shall be sold to the
highest bidder at a public auction for cash, the auction to be conducted by the
county sheriff or his or her designee at such place, on such notice, and in
accordance with the same procedure, as far as practicable, as is required in
the case of sales of land under execution at law. The proceeds of the sale
shall first be applied to the cost and expense in administering and conducting
the sale, then to the satisfaction of all mortgages, deeds of trust, liens, and
encumbrances of record on the property. The remaining proceeds shall be
remitted in the same manner as provided in subsection (13) of this section.
(16) The forfeiture procedure set forth in this section is the sole remedy
of any claimant, and no court shall have jurisdiction to interfere therewith by
replevin, by injunction, by supersedeas, or by any other manner.
Sec. 9. Section 27-1301, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
27-1301 (1) In any judicial or administrative proceeding, any property or
material that constitutes child sexual abuse material a visual depiction of
sexually explicit conduct, as defined in section 2 of this act 28-1463.02, and
which has a child, as defined in such section, as one of its participants or
portrayed observers, shall remain constantly and continuously in the care,
custody, and control of law enforcement, the prosecuting attorney, or the court
having properly received it into evidence, except as provided in subsection (3)
of this section.
(2) All courts and administrative agencies shall unequivocally deny any
request by the defendant, his or her attorney, or any other person, agency, or
organization, regardless of whether such defendant, attorney, or other person,
agency, or organization is a party in interest or not, to acquire possession
-6-

LB383 LB383
2025 2025
of, copy, photograph, duplicate, or otherwise reproduce any property or
material that constitutes child sexual abuse material a visual depiction of
sexually explicit conduct, as defined in section 2 of this act 28-1463.02, and
which has a child, as defined in such section, as one of its participants or
portrayed observers, so long as the state makes the property or material
reasonably available to the defendant in a criminal proceeding. Nothing in this
section shall be deemed to prohibit the review of the proscribed materials or
property by a federal court when considering a habeas corpus claim.
(3)(a) For purposes of this section, property or material are deemed to be
reasonably available to a defendant if the state provides ample opportunity for
inspection, viewing, examination, and analysis of the property or material, at
a law enforcement or state-operated facility, to the defendant, his or her
attorney, and any individual the defendant seeks to use for the purpose of
furnishing expert testimony.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, a court may order a
copy of the property or material to be delivered to a person identified as a
defense expert for the purpose of evaluating the evidence, subject to the same
restrictions placed upon law enforcement. The defense expert shall return all
copies and materials to law enforcement upon completion of the evaluation.
(4) The On or before July 1, 2009, the Supreme Court shall adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations regarding the proper control, care, custody,
transfer, and disposition of property or material that constitutes child sexual
abuse material a visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct, as defined in
section 2 of this act 28-1463.02, and which has a child, as defined in such
section, as one of its participants or portrayed observers, that has been
received into evidence at any judicial or administrative proceeding. Among the
issues addressed by these rules and regulations, the Supreme Court should
devise procedures regarding the preparation and delivery of bills of exception
containing evidence as described in this section, as well as procedures for
storing, accessing, and disposing of such bills of exception after preparation
and receipt.
Sec. 10. Section 28-116, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
28-116 The changes made to the sections listed in this section by Laws
2015, LB605, shall not apply to any offense committed prior to August 30, 2015.
Any such offense shall be construed and punished according to the provisions of
law existing at the time the offense was committed. For purposes of this
section, an offense shall be deemed to have been committed prior to August 30,
2015, if any element of the offense occurred prior to such date. The following
sections are subject to this provision: Sections 9-262, 9-352, 9-434, 9-652,
23-135.01, 28-105, 28-106, 28-201, 28-204, 28-305, 28-306, 28-309, 28-310.01,
28-311, 28-311.01, 28-311.04, 28-311.08, 28-320, 28-322.02, 28-322.03,
28-322.04, 28-323, 28-393, 28-394, 28-397, 28-416, 28-504, 28-507, 28-514,
28-518, 28-519, 28-603, 28-604, 28-611, 28-611.01, 28-620, 28-621, 28-622,
28-627, 28-631, 28-638, 28-639, 28-703, 28-707, 28-813.01, 28-912, 28-932,
28-1005, 28-1009, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1212.03, 28-1222, 28-1224,
28-1344, 28-1345, 28-1463.05, 29-1816, 29-2204, 29-2260, 29-2308, 29-4011,
60-6,197.03, 60-6,197.06, 68-1017, 68-1017.01, 71-2228, and 71-2229 and
sections 3 and 4 of this act.
Sec. 11. Section 28-320.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-320.02 (1) No person shall knowingly solicit, coax, entice, or lure (a)
a child sixteen years of age or younger or (b) a peace officer who is believed
by such person to be a child sixteen years of age or younger, by means of an
electronic communication device as that term is defined in section 28-833, to
engage in an act which would be in violation of section 28-319, 28-319.01, or
28-320.01 or subsection (1) or (2) of section 28-320. A person shall not be
convicted of both a violation of this subsection and a violation of section
28-319, 28-319.01, or 28-320.01 or subsection (1) or (2) of section 28-320 if
the violations arise out of the same set of facts or pattern of conduct and the
individual solicited, coaxed, enticed, or lured under this subsection is also
the victim of the sexual assault under section 28-319, 28-319.01, or 28-320.01
or subsection (1) or (2) of section 28-320.
(2) A person who violates this section is guilty of a Class ID felony. If
a person who violates this section has previously been convicted of a covered
offense as defined in section 2 of this act violation of this section or
section 28-308, 28-309, 28-310, 28-311, 28-313, 28-314, 28-315, 28-319,
28-319.01, 28-320.01, 28-813.01, 28-833, 28-1463.03, or 28-1463.05 or
subsection (1) or (2) of section 28-320, the person is guilty of a Class IC
felony.
Sec. 12. Section 28-813.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-813.02 Any commercial film and photographic print processor who has
knowledge of or observes, within the scope of his or her professional capacity
or employment, and who participates in an investigation or the making of any
report pertaining to any film, photograph, videotape, negative, or slide
depicting child sexual abuse material a child under the age of eighteen years
engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct, as defined in section 2 of this
act 28-1463.02, or participates in a judicial proceeding resulting from such
participation shall be immune from any liability, civil or criminal, that might
otherwise be incurred or imposed, except for maliciously false statements.
Sec. 13. Section 28-833, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
-7-

LB383 LB383
2025 2025
28-833 (1) A person commits the offense of enticement by electronic
communication device if he or she is nineteen years of age or over and
knowingly and intentionally utilizes an electronic communication device to
contact a child under sixteen years of age or a peace officer who is believed
by such person to be a child under sixteen years of age and in so doing:
(a) Uses or transmits any indecent, lewd, lascivious, or obscene language,
writing, or sound;
(b) Transmits or otherwise disseminates any visual depiction of sexually
explicit conduct as defined in section 28-1463.02; or
(c) Offers or solicits any indecent, lewd, or lascivious act.
(2) Enticement by electronic communication device is a Class IV felony.
(3) Enticement by electronic communication device is deemed to have been
committed either at the place where the communication was initiated or where it
was received.
(4) For purposes of this section: ,
(a) Electronic electronic communication device means any device which, in
its ordinary and intended use, transmits by electronic means writings, sounds,
visual images, or data of any nature to another electronic communication
device; .
(b) Sexually explicit conduct has the same meaning as in section 2 of this
act; and
(c) Visual depiction has the same meaning as in section 2 of this act.
Sec. 14. Section 28-1354, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
28-1354 For purposes of the Public Protection Act:
(1) Enterprise means any individual, sole proprietorship, partnership,
corporation, trust, association, or any legal entity, union, or group of
individuals associated in fact although not a legal entity, and shall include
illicit as well as licit enterprises as well as other entities;
(2) Pattern of racketeering activity means a cumulative loss for one or
more victims or gains for the enterprise of not less than one thousand five
hundred dollars resulting from at least two acts of racketeering activity, one
of which occurred after August 30, 2009, and the last of which occurred within
ten years, excluding any period of imprisonment, after the commission of a
prior act of racketeering activity;
(3) Until January 1, 2017, person means any individual or entity, as
defined in section 21-2014, holding or capable of holding a legal, equitable,
or beneficial interest in property. Beginning January 1, 2017, person means any
individual or entity, as defined in section 21-214, holding or capable of
holding a legal, equitable, or beneficial interest in property;
(4) Prosecutor includes the Attorney General of the State of Nebraska, the
deputy attorney general, assistant attorneys general, a county attorney, a
deputy county attorney, or any person so designated by the Attorney General, a
county attorney, or a court of the state to carry out the powers conferred by
the act;
(5) Racketeering activity includes the commission of, criminal attempt to
commit, conspiracy to commit, aiding and abetting in the commission of, aiding
in the consummation of, acting as an accessory to the commission of, or the
solicitation, coercion, or intimidation of another to commit or aid in the
commission of any of the following:
(a) Offenses against the person which include: Murder in the first degree
under section 28-303; murder in the second degree under section 28-304;
manslaughter under section 28-305; assault in the first degree under section
28-308; assault in the second degree under section 28-309; assault in the third
degree under section 28-310; terroristic threats under section 28-311.01;
kidnapping under section 28-313; false imprisonment in the first degree under
section 28-314; false imprisonment in the second degree under section 28-315;
sexual assault in the first degree under section 28-319; and robbery under
section 28-324;
(b) Offenses relating to controlled substances which include: To
unlawfully manufacture, distribute, deliver, dispense, or possess with intent
to manufacture, distribute, deliver, or dispense a controlled substance under
subsection (1) of section 28-416; possession of marijuana weighing more than
one pound under subsection (12) of section 28-416; possession of money used or
intended to be used to facilitate a violation of subsection (1) of section
28-416 prohibited under subsection (17) of section 28-416; any violation of
section 28-418; to unlawfully manufacture, distribute, deliver, or possess with
intent to distribute or deliver an imitation controlled substance under section
28-445; possession of anhydrous ammonia with the intent to manufacture
methamphetamine under section 28-451; and possession of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine with the intent to manufacture
methamphetamine under section 28-452;
(c) Offenses against property which include: Arson in the first degree
under section 28-502; arson in the second degree under section 28-503; arson in
the third degree under section 28-504; burglary under section 28-507; theft by
unlawful taking or disposition under section 28-511; theft by shoplifting under
section 28-511.01; theft by deception under section 28-512; theft by extortion
under section 28-513; theft of services under section 28-515; theft by
receiving stolen property under section 28-517; criminal mischief under section
28-519; and unlawfully depriving or obtaining property or services using a
computer under section 28-1344;
(d) Offenses involving fraud which include: Burning to defraud an insurer
under section 28-505; forgery in the first degree under section 28-602; forgery
-8-

LB383 LB383
2025 2025
in the second degree under section 28-603; criminal possession of a forged
instrument under section 28-604; criminal possession of written instrument
forgery devices under section 28-605; criminal impersonation under section
28-638; identity theft under section 28-639; identity fraud under section
28-640; false statement or book entry under section 28-612; tampering with a
publicly exhibited contest under section 28-614; issuing a false financial
statement for purposes of obtaining a financial transaction device under
section 28-619; unauthorized use of a financial transaction device under
section 28-620; criminal possession of a financial transaction device under
section 28-621; unlawful circulation of a financial transaction device in the
first degree under section 28-622; unlawful circulation of a financial
transaction device in the second degree under section 28-623; criminal
possession of a blank financial transaction device under section 28-624;
criminal sale of a blank financial transaction device under section 28-625;
criminal possession of a financial transaction forgery device under section
28-626; unlawful manufacture of a financial transaction device under section
28-627; laundering of sales forms under section 28-628; unlawful acquisition of
sales form processing services under section 28-629; unlawful factoring of a
financial transaction device under section 28-630; and fraudulent insurance
acts under section 28-631;
(e) Offenses involving governmental operations which include: Abuse of
public records under section 28-911; perjury or subornation of perjury under
section 28-915; bribery under section 28-917; bribery of a witness under
section 28-918; tampering with a witness or informant or jury tampering under
section 28-919; bribery of a juror under section 28-920; assault on an officer,
an emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a Department of Health
and Human Services employee, or a health care professional in the first degree
under section 28-929; assault on an officer, an emergency responder, a state
correctional employee, a Department of Health and Human Services employee, or a
health care professional in the second degree under section 28-930; assault on
an officer, an emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a Department
of Health and Human Services employee, or a health care professional in the
third degree under section 28-931; and assault on an officer, an emergency
responder, a state correctional employee, a Department of Health and Human
Services employee, or a health care professional using a motor vehicle under
section 28-931.01;
(f) Offenses involving gambling which include: Promoting gambling in the
first degree under section 28-1102; possession of gambling records under
section 28-1105; gambling debt collection under section 28-1105.01; and
possession of a gambling device under section 28-1107;
(g) Offenses relating to firearms, weapons, and explosives which include:
Carrying a concealed weapon under section 28-1202; transportation or possession
of machine guns, short rifles, or short shotguns under section 28-1203;
unlawful possession of a handgun under section 28-1204; unlawful transfer of a
firearm to a juvenile under section 28-1204.01; possession of a firearm by a
prohibited juvenile offender under section 28-1204.05; using a deadly weapon to
commit a felony, possession of a deadly weapon during the commission of a
felony, or carrying a firearm or destructive device during the commission of a
dangerous misdemeanor under section 28-1205; possession of a deadly weapon by a
prohibited person under section 28-1206; possession of a defaced firearm under
section 28-1207; defacing a firearm under section 28-1208; unlawful discharge
of a firearm under section 28-1212.02; possession, receipt, retention, or
disposition of a stolen firearm under section 28-1212.03; unlawful possession
of explosive materials in the first degree under section 28-1215; unlawful
possession of explosive materials in the second degree under section 28-1216;
unlawful sale of explosives under section 28-1217; use of explosives without a
permit under section 28-1218; obtaining an explosives permit through false
representations under section 28-1219; possession of a destructive device under
section 28-1220; threatening the use of explosives or placing a false bomb
under section 28-1221; using explosives to commit a felony under section
28-1222; using explosives to damage or destroy property under section 28-1223;
and using explosives to kill or injure any person under section 28-1224;
(h) Any violation of the Securities Act of Nebraska pursuant to section
8-1117;
(i) Any violation of the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 pursuant to section
77-2713;
(j) Offenses relating to public health and morals which include:
Prostitution under section 28-801; pandering under section 28-802; keeping a
place of prostitution under section 28-804; labor trafficking, sex trafficking,
labor trafficking of a minor, or sex trafficking of a minor under section
28-831; a violation of section 28-1005; and any act relating to the visual
depiction of sexually explicit conduct prohibited in the Child Sexual Abuse
Material Child Pornography Prevention Act; and
(k) A violation of the Computer Crimes Act;
(6) State means the State of Nebraska or any political subdivision or any
department, agency, or instrumentality thereof; and
(7) Unlawful debt means a debt of at least one thousand five hundred
dollars:
(a) Incurred or contracted in gambling activity which was in violation of
federal law or the law of the state or which is unenforceable under state or
federal law in whole or in part as to principal or interest because of the laws
relating to usury; or
(b) Which was incurred in connection with the business of gambling in
-9-

LB383 LB383
2025 2025
violation of federal law or the law of the state or the business of lending
money or a thing of value at a rate usurious under state law if the usurious
rate is at least twice the enforceable rate.
Sec. 15. Section 28-1601, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
28-1601 (1) For purposes of sections 28-1601 to 28-1603:
(a) Covered offense means a violation of the Child Sexual Abuse Material
Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section 28-1102, 28-1103,
28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107;
(b) Electronic communication device has the same meaning as in section
28-833; and
(c) Gambling device has the same meaning as in section 28-1101.
(2) (1) In addition to existing penalties for a violation of a covered
offense the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416,
or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or
28-1107, a court may order forfeiture of any money, securities, negotiable
instruments, firearms, conveyances, or electronic communication devices; as
defined in section 28-833, any equipment, components, peripherals, software,
hardware, or accessories related to electronic communication devices; , or any
gambling devices as defined in section 28-1101 if:
(a) The owner or possessor of the property has been convicted of a covered
offense violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of
section 28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105,
28-1105.01, or 28-1107;
(b) The information charging such violation specifically requests the
forfeiture of property upon conviction and is prepared pursuant to section
28-1602; and
(c) It The property is found by clear and convincing evidence that such
property was to have been derived from, used, or intended to be used to
facilitate a covered offense violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act,
subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103,
28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107.
(3) (2) Following the filing of an information charging a violation of a
covered offense the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section
28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01,
or 28-1107 that specifically seeks forfeiture of any property listed in
subsection (2) (1) of this section, the defendant may request a pretrial
hearing to determine the existence of probable cause to believe that the
property specifically sought to be forfeited was derived from, used, or
intended to be used to facilitate a covered offense violation of the Child
Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section
28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107. The
request for a hearing pursuant to this section must be filed with the district
court in which the criminal proceeding is pending within thirty days after the
filing of the information.
(4)(a) (3) At any time after the filing of the information in district
court and prior to final disposition of the criminal case, any person or
entity, other than the defendant, with a claimed legal interest in the property
may petition to intervene in the district court with jurisdiction over the
criminal case for the specific and limited purpose of demonstrating such
person's his, her, or its legal interest in the property and such person's his,
her, or its lack of actual knowledge that such property was derived from, used,
or intended to be used to facilitate a covered offense in violation of the
Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section
28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107.
(b) In the petition to intervene, the intervening person or entity shall,
at a minimum, state facts demonstrating such person's his, her, or its legal
interest in the property and such person's his, her, or its lack of actual
knowledge regarding the use or intended use of the property.
(5) Within thirty days after filing a motion to intervene, the district
court shall conduct an evidentiary hearing on the matter. At the conclusion of
such hearing, the court may order that any or all of the property be returned
to the intervening claimant after it is no longer needed as evidence in the
criminal case upon a showing by the claimant by a preponderance of the
evidence:
(a) That the claimant that he, she, or it has a legally recognized
interest in the property; and
(b) Either either (i) that such property was acquired by the claimant in
good faith and the claimant he, she, or it did not have actual knowledge that
such property was derived from, used, or intended to be used to facilitate a
covered offense violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection
(1) of section 28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104,
28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107 or (ii) that the property seized was not
derived from, used, or intended to be used to facilitate a covered offense
violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section
28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01,
or 28-1107.
(6) The court, on its own motion or upon application of the intervening
claimant, may permit the claimant such person to proceed in forma pauperis
under sections 25-2301 to 25-2310. The court, on its own motion or upon
application of the intervening claimant, may appoint counsel to represent the
claimant such person if the claimant such person is indigent. If the claimant
he or she asserts indigency, the court shall make a reasonable inquiry to
-10-

LB383 LB383
2025 2025
determine the claimant's such person's financial condition and may require the
claimant him or her to execute an affidavit of indigency for filing with the
clerk of the court.
(7) (4) After conviction but prior to sentencing for a covered offense
violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section
28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01,
or 28-1107 in cases in which the prosecuting authority has specifically
requested forfeiture of property, the district court shall conduct an
evidentiary hearing at which the prosecuting authority must prove by clear and
convincing evidence what specific amount or portion of the property
specifically enumerated in the criminal information was derived from, used, or
intended for use in furtherance of a covered offense violation of the Child
Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section
28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107. At the
conclusion of such hearing, the court shall make specific findings of fact
indicating what amount or portion of the property sought to be forfeited by the
state was derived from, used, or intended to be used to facilitate a covered
offense violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of
section 28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105,
28-1105.01, or 28-1107. The court shall order any amount or portion of the
property not proven by the state to be derived from, used, or intended to be
used to facilitate a covered offense violation of the Child Pornography
Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section 28-813.01,
28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107 or the fair market
value of the legally recognized interest in such property be returned to its
rightful and legal owner or interest holder.
(8)(a) (5)(a) The court shall order that any amount or portion of property
proven by the state by clear and convincing evidence to be derived from, used,
or intended to be used to facilitate a covered offense violation of the Child
Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section
28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107 be
forfeited to the state and disposition of such property be conducted in
accordance with this subsection and section 28-1439.02 at such time as the
property is no longer required as evidence in any criminal proceeding.
(b) As part of any disposition of property, the court may order that: (i)
Any money, securities, or negotiable instruments be distributed as provided in
Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska; (ii) any conveyances
be sold or put to official use by the seizing agency for a period of not more
than one year and when such property is no longer necessary for official use or
at the end of two years, whichever comes first, such property shall be sold.
Proceeds from the sale of any conveyance shall be distributed as provided in
Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska; (iii) any electronic
communication devices as defined in section 28-833, any equipment, components,
peripherals, software, hardware, or accessories related to electronic
communication devices, or any gambling devices as defined in section 28-1101 be
destroyed by a law enforcement agency; and (iv) the disposition of firearms
shall be effectuated pursuant to section 29-820.
(c) As used in this subsection, official use means use directly in
connection with enforcement of the Child Sexual Abuse Material Child
Pornography Prevention Act, the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, or section
28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107.
(9) (6) Any money, securities, negotiable instruments, firearms,
conveyances, or electronic communication devices; as defined in section 28-833,
any equipment, components, peripherals, software, hardware, or accessories
related to electronic communication devices; , or any gambling devices as
defined in section 28-1101 may be forfeited pursuant to a plea agreement
between the state and the defendant subject to notice to or approval of the
court.
(10) (7) Subdivision (2)(a) (1)(a) of this section does not apply if the
owner or possessor of the property dies or is removed from the United States
before charges are filed or a conviction obtained.
(11) (8) Subdivision (2)(b) (1)(b) of this section does not apply if the
owner or possessor of the property dies or is removed from the United States
before charges are filed so long as the statute of limitations for a covered
offense violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of
section 28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105,
28-1105.01, or 28-1107 has not expired.
(12) (9) Subdivision (2)(a) (1)(a) of this section does not apply if the
owner or possessor of the property is unknown or incapable of being determined
for some legitimate reason or fails to appear in court as ordered after
prosecution for a covered offense violation of the Child Pornography Prevention
Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103,
28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107 is commenced and is not apprehended
within twelve months after the failure to appear order was issued by the court.
(13) (10) If the owner or possessor of the property fails to appear in
court as ordered after prosecution for a covered offense violation of the Child
Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section
28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107 is
commenced but appears or is apprehended within twelve months after the failure
to appear order was issued by the court, the court may order the owner or
possessor of the property, as a part of any sentence imposed for either the
failure to appear or the conviction for a covered offense of the Child
Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section
-11-

LB383 LB383
2025 2025
28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107, to pay a
storage fee of one hundred dollars per month for each month the property was
held following the issuance of the failure to appear order.
Sec. 16. Section 28-1602, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
28-1602 (1) The prosecuting authority must specifically plead its intent
to seek forfeiture of any property upon a conviction for a covered offense
violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section
28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01,
or 28-1107 in the same criminal information charging the underlying covered
offense violation of the Child Pornography Prevention Act, subsection (1) of
section 28-416, or section 28-813.01, 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105,
28-1105.01, or 28-1107.
(2) In pleading its intent to seek forfeiture, the information shall
specifically (a) state the date the property was seized, (b) state the place
the property was seized from, (c) describe the property sought to be forfeited,
and (d) if known, state the name of the owner of the property, the name of the
person or persons in possession of the property or in physical proximity to the
property when it was seized, and the name of any other person or entity that
may have a claim or interest in the property.
Sec. 17. Section 28-1701, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
28-1701 (1) A person shall not be arrested or prosecuted for an eligible
alcohol or drug offense if such person witnessed or was the victim of a sexual
assault and such person:
(a) Either:
(i) In good faith, reported such sexual assault to law enforcement; or
(ii) Requested emergency medical assistance for the victim of the sexual
assault; and
(b) Evidence supporting the arrest or prosecution of the eligible alcohol
or drug offense was obtained or discovered as a result of such person reporting
such sexual assault to law enforcement or requesting emergency medical
assistance.
(2) A person shall not be arrested or prosecuted for an eligible alcohol
or drug offense if:
(a) Evidence supporting the arrest or prosecution of the person for the
offense was obtained or discovered as a result of the investigation or
prosecution of a sexual assault; and
(b) Such person cooperates with law enforcement in the investigation or
prosecution of the sexual assault.
(3) For purposes of this section:
(a) Eligible alcohol or drug offense means:
(i) A violation of subsection (3) or (13) of section 28-416 or of section
28-441;
(ii) A violation of section 53-180.02 committed by a person older than
eighteen years of age and under the age of twenty-one years, as described in
subdivision (4)(a) of section 53-180.05;
(iii) A violation of a city or village ordinance similar to subdivision
(3)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section; or
(iv) Attempt, conspiracy, solicitation, being an accessory to, aiding and
abetting, aiding the consummation of, or compounding a felony with any of the
offenses in subdivision (3)(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this section as the
underlying offense; and
(b) Sexual assault means:
(i) A violation of section 28-316.01, 28-319, 28-319.01, 28-320,
28-320.01, 28-320.02, 28-322.01, 28-322.02, 28-322.03, 28-322.04, 28-322.05, or
28-703, or section 5 of this act 28-1463.03, sex trafficking or sex trafficking
of a minor under section 28-831, or subdivision (1)(c) or (g) of section 28-386
or subdivision (1)(d), (e), or (f) of section 28-707; or
(ii) Attempt, conspiracy, solicitation, being an accessory to, aiding and
abetting, aiding the consummation of, or compounding a felony with any of the
offenses listed in subdivision (3)(b)(i) of this section as the underlying
offense.
Sec. 18. Section 29-110, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
29-110 (1) Except as otherwise provided by law, no person shall be
prosecuted for any felony unless the indictment is found by a grand jury within
three years next after the offense has been done or committed or unless a
complaint for the same is filed before the magistrate within three years next
after the offense has been done or committed and a warrant for the arrest of
the defendant has been issued.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, no person shall be prosecuted,
tried, or punished for any misdemeanor or other indictable offense below the
grade of felony or for any fine or forfeiture under any penal statute unless
the suit, information, or indictment for such offense is instituted or found
within one year and six months from the time of committing the offense or
incurring the fine or forfeiture or within one year for any offense the
punishment of which is restricted by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars
and to imprisonment not exceeding three months.
(3) Except as otherwise provided by law, no person shall be prosecuted for
kidnapping under section 28-313, false imprisonment under section 28-314 or
28-315, child abuse under section 28-707, pandering under section 28-802,
debauching a minor under section 28-805, or an offense under section 28-813
-12-

LB383 LB383
2025 2025
when the victim is under sixteen years of age at the time of the offense (a)
unless the indictment for such offense is found by a grand jury within seven
years next after the offense has been committed or within seven years next
after the victim's sixteenth birthday, whichever is later, or (b) unless a
complaint for such offense is filed before the magistrate within seven years
next after the offense has been committed or within seven years next after the
victim's sixteenth birthday, whichever is later, and a warrant for the arrest
of the defendant has been issued.
(4) Except as otherwise provided by law, no person shall be prosecuted for
a violation of subsection (2) or (3) of section 28-831 (a) unless the
indictment for such offense is found by a grand jury within seven years next
after the offense has been committed or within seven years next after the
victim's eighteenth birthday, whichever is later, or (b) unless a complaint for
such offense is filed before the magistrate within seven years next after the
offense has been committed or within seven years next after the victim's
eighteenth birthday, whichever is later, and a warrant for the arrest of the
defendant has been issued.
(5) Except as otherwise provided by law, no person shall be prosecuted for
an offense under section 3 or 4 of this act 28-813.01 or 28-1463.05 (a) unless
the indictment for such offense is found by a grand jury within seven years
next after the offense has been committed or within seven years next after the
victim's eighteenth birthday, whichever is later, or (b) unless a complaint for
such offense is filed before the magistrate within seven years next after the
offense has been committed or within seven years next after the victim's
eighteenth birthday, whichever is later, and a warrant for the arrest of the
defendant has been issued.
(6) No person shall be prosecuted for a violation of the Securities Act of
Nebraska under section 8-1117 unless the indictment for such offense is found
by a grand jury within five years next after the offense has been done or
committed or unless a complaint for such offense is filed before the magistrate
within five years next after the offense has been done or committed and a
warrant for the arrest of the defendant has been issued.
(7) No person shall be prosecuted for criminal impersonation under section
28-638, identity theft under section 28-639, or identity fraud under section
28-640 unless the indictment for such offense is found by a grand jury within
five years next after the offense has been done or committed or unless a
complaint for such offense is filed before the magistrate within five years
next after the offense has been done or committed and a warrant for the arrest
of the defendant has been issued.
(8) No person shall be prosecuted for a violation of section 68-1017 if
the aggregate value of all funds and other benefits obtained or attempted to be
obtained is five hundred dollars or more unless the indictment for such offense
is found by a grand jury within five years next after the offense has been done
or committed or unless a complaint for such offense is filed before the
magistrate within five years next after the offense has been done or committed
and a warrant for the arrest of the defendant has been issued.
(9) No person shall be prosecuted for knowing and intentional abuse,
neglect, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult or senior adult under section
28-386 unless the indictment for such offense is found by a grand jury within
six years next after the offense has been done or committed or unless a
complaint for such offense is filed before the magistrate within six years next
after the offense has been done or committed and a warrant for the arrest of
the defendant has been issued.
(10) Except as otherwise provided by law, no person shall be prosecuted
for an offense under section 28-717 (a) unless the indictment for such offense
is found by a grand jury within one year and six months next after the offense
has been committed or within one year and six months next after the child
reaches the age of majority, whichever is later, or (b) unless a complaint for
such offense is filed before the magistrate within one year and six months next
after the offense has been committed or within one year and six months next
after the child reaches the age of majority, whichever is later, and a warrant
for the arrest of the defendant has been issued.
(11) There shall not be any time limitations for prosecution or punishment
for treason, murder, arson, forgery, sexual assault in the first or second
degree under section 28-319 or 28-320, sexual assault of a child in the second
or third degree under section 28-320.01, incest under section 28-703, sexual
assault of a child in the first degree under section 28-319.01, labor
trafficking of a minor or sex trafficking of a minor under subsection (1) of
section 28-831, or an offense under section 5 of this act 28-1463.03; nor shall
there be any time limitations for prosecution or punishment for sexual assault
in the third degree under section 28-320 when the victim is under sixteen years
of age at the time of the offense.
(12) The time limitations prescribed in this section shall include all
inchoate offenses pursuant to the Nebraska Criminal Code and compounding a
felony pursuant to section 28-301.
(13) The time limitations prescribed in this section shall not extend to
any person fleeing from justice.
(14) When any suit, information, or indictment for any crime or
misdemeanor is limited by any statute to be brought or exhibited within any
other time than is limited by this section, then the suit, information, or
indictment shall be brought or exhibited within the time limited by such
statute.
(15) If any suit, information, or indictment is quashed or the proceedings
-13-

LB383 LB383
2025 2025
set aside or reversed on writ of error, the time during the pendency of such
suit, information, or indictment so quashed, set aside, or reversed shall not
be reckoned within this statute so as to bar any new suit, information, or
indictment for the same offense.
(16) The changes made to this section by Laws 2004, LB 943, shall apply to
offenses committed prior to April 16, 2004, for which the statute of
limitations has not expired as of such date and to offenses committed on or
after such date.
(17) The changes made to this section by Laws 2005, LB 713, shall apply to
offenses committed prior to September 4, 2005, for which the statute of
limitations has not expired as of such date and to offenses committed on or
after such date.
(18) The changes made to this section by Laws 2009, LB 97, and Laws 2006,
LB 1199, shall apply to offenses committed prior to May 21, 2009, for which the
statute of limitations has not expired as of such date and to offenses
committed on or after such date.
(19) The changes made to this section by Laws 2010, LB809, shall apply to
offenses committed prior to July 15, 2010, for which the statute of limitations
has not expired as of such date and to offenses committed on or after such
date.
(20) The changes made to this section by Laws 2016, LB934, shall apply to
offenses committed prior to April 19, 2016, for which the statute of
limitations has not expired as of such date and to offenses committed on or
after such date.
(21) The changes made to this section by Laws 2019, LB519, shall apply to
offenses committed prior to September 1, 2019, for which the statute of
limitations has not expired as of such date and to offenses committed on or
after such date.
Sec. 19. Section 29-119, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
29-119 For purposes of this section and sections 23-1201, 29-120, and
29-2261, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) A plea agreement means that as a result of a discussion between the
defense counsel and the prosecuting attorney:
(a) A charge is to be dismissed or reduced; or
(b) A defendant, if he or she pleads guilty to a charge, may receive less
than the maximum penalty permitted by law; and
(2)(a) Victim means a person who has had a personal confrontation with an
offender as a result of a homicide under sections 28-302 to 28-306, a first
degree assault under section 28-308, a second degree assault under section
28-309, a third degree assault under section 28-310 when the victim is an
intimate partner as defined in section 28-323, a first degree false
imprisonment under section 28-314, a first degree sexual assault under section
28-319, a sexual assault of a child in the first degree under section
28-319.01, a second or third degree sexual assault under section 28-320, a
sexual assault of a child in the second or third degree under section
28-320.01, domestic assault in the first, second, or third degree under section
28-323, or a robbery under section 28-324. Victim also includes a person who
has suffered serious bodily injury as defined in section 28-109 as a result of
a motor vehicle accident when the driver was charged with a violation of
section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197 or with a violation of a city or village ordinance
enacted in conformance with either section.
(b) In the case of a homicide, victim means the nearest surviving relative
under the law as provided by section 30-2303 but does not include the alleged
perpetrator of the homicide.
(c) In the case of a violation of the Child Sexual Abuse Material
Prevention Act section 28-813.01, 28-1463.03, 28-1463.04, or 28-1463.05, victim
means a person who was a child as defined in section 2 of this act 28-1463.02
and a participant or portrayed observer in the child sexual abuse material that
visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct which is the subject of the
violation and who has been identified and can be reasonably notified and the
parents, guardians, or duly appointed legal representative of the child victim
but does not include the alleged perpetrator of the crime.
(d) In the case of a sexual assault of a child , a possession offense of a
visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct, or a distribution offense of a
visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct, victim means the child victim
and the parents, guardians, or duly appointed legal representative of the child
victim but does not include the alleged perpetrator of the crime.
(e) Victim also includes a person who was the victim of a theft under
section 28-511, 28-512, 28-513, or 28-517 when (i) the value of the thing
involved is five thousand dollars or more and (ii) the victim and perpetrator
were intimate partners as defined in section 28-323.
(f) Victim also includes a sexual assault victim as defined in section
29-4309.
Sec. 20. Section 29-4003, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
29-4003 (1)(a) The Sex Offender Registration Act applies to any person who
on or after January 1, 1997:
(i) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found guilty
of any of the following:
(A) Kidnapping of a minor pursuant to section 28-313, except when the
person is the parent of the minor and was not convicted of any other offense in
this section;
-14-

LB383 LB383
2025 2025
(B) False imprisonment of a minor pursuant to section 28-314 or 28-315;
(C) Sexual assault pursuant to section 28-319 or 28-320;
(D) Sexual abuse by a school employee pursuant to section 28-316.01;
(E) Sexual assault of a child in the second or third degree pursuant to
section 28-320.01;
(F) Sexual assault of a child in the first degree pursuant to section
28-319.01;
(G) Sexual abuse of a vulnerable adult or senior adult pursuant to
subdivision (1)(c) of section 28-386;
(H) Incest of a minor pursuant to section 28-703;
(I) Pandering of a minor pursuant to section 28-802;
(J) Conduct relating to child sexual abuse material under section 5 of
this act Visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct of a child pursuant to
section 28-1463.03 or subdivision (2)(b) or (c) of section 4 of this act
28-1463.05;
(K) Knowingly possessing or receiving any child sexual abuse material
visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct which has a child as one of its
participants or portrayed observers pursuant to subsection (1) or (5) (4) of
section 3 of this act 28-813.01;
(L) Criminal child enticement pursuant to section 28-311;
(M) Child enticement by means of an electronic communication device
pursuant to section 28-320.02;
(N) Debauching a minor pursuant to section 28-805; or
(O) Attempt, solicitation, aiding or abetting, being an accessory, or
conspiracy to commit an offense listed in subdivisions (1)(a)(i)(A) through (1)
(a)(i)(N) of this section;
(ii) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
guilty of any offense that is substantially equivalent to a registrable offense
under subdivision (1)(a)(i) of this section by any village, town, city, state,
territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United States, by the
United States Government, by court-martial or other military tribunal, or by a
foreign jurisdiction, notwithstanding a procedure comparable in effect to that
described under section 29-2264 or any other procedure to nullify a conviction
other than by pardon;
(iii) Is incarcerated in a jail, a penal or correctional facility, or any
other public or private institution or is under probation or parole as a result
of pleading guilty to or being found guilty of a registrable offense under
subdivision (1)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section prior to January 1, 1997; or
(iv) Enters the state and is required to register as a sex offender under
the laws of another village, town, city, state, territory, commonwealth, or
other jurisdiction of the United States.
(b) In addition to the registrable offenses under subdivision (1)(a) of
this section, the Sex Offender Registration Act applies to any person who on or
after January 1, 2010:
(i)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (1)(b)(i)(B) of this section, has
ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of any of
the following:
(I) Murder in the first degree pursuant to section 28-303;
(II) Murder in the second degree pursuant to section 28-304;
(III) Manslaughter pursuant to section 28-305;
(IV) Assault in the first degree pursuant to section 28-308;
(V) Assault in the second degree pursuant to section 28-309;
(VI) Assault in the third degree pursuant to section 28-310;
(VII) Stalking pursuant to section 28-311.03;
(VIII) Violation of section 28-311.08 requiring registration under the act
pursuant to subsection (6) of section 28-311.08;
(IX) Kidnapping pursuant to section 28-313;
(X) False imprisonment pursuant to section 28-314 or 28-315;
(XI) Sexual abuse of an inmate or parolee in the first degree pursuant to
section 28-322.02;
(XII) Sexual abuse of an inmate or parolee in the second degree pursuant
to section 28-322.03;
(XIII) Sexual abuse of a protected individual pursuant to section
28-322.04;
(XIV) Incest pursuant to section 28-703;
(XV) Child abuse pursuant to subdivision (1)(d) or (e) of section 28-707;
(XVI) Enticement by electronic communication device pursuant to section
28-833; or
(XVII) Attempt, solicitation, aiding or abetting, being an accessory, or
conspiracy to commit an offense listed in subdivisions (1)(b)(i)(A)(I) through
(1)(b)(i)(A)(XVI) of this section.
(B) In order for the Sex Offender Registration Act to apply to the
offenses listed in subdivisions (1)(b)(i)(A)(I), (II), (III), (IV), (V), (VI),
(VII), (IX), and (X) of this section, a court shall have found that evidence of
sexual penetration or sexual contact, as those terms are defined in section
28-318, was present in the record, which shall include consideration of the
factual basis for a plea-based conviction and information contained in the
presentence report;
(ii) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
guilty of any offense that is substantially equivalent to a registrable offense
under subdivision (1)(b)(i) of this section by any village, town, city, state,
territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United States, by the
United States Government, by court-martial or other military tribunal, or by a
-15-

LB383 LB383
2025 2025
foreign jurisdiction, notwithstanding a procedure comparable in effect to that
described under section 29-2264 or any other procedure to nullify a conviction
other than by pardon; or
(iii) Enters the state and is required to register as a sex offender under
the laws of another village, town, city, state, territory, commonwealth, or
other jurisdiction of the United States.
(c) In addition to the registrable offenses under subdivisions (1)(a) and
(b) of this section, the Sex Offender Registration Act applies to any person
who on or after January 1, 2020:
(i) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found guilty
of sexual abuse of a detainee under section 28-322.05; or
(ii) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
guilty of any offense that is substantially equivalent to a registrable offense
under subdivision (1)(c)(i) of this section by any village, town, city, state,
territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United States, by the
United States Government, by court-martial or other military tribunal, or by a
foreign jurisdiction, notwithstanding a procedure comparable in effect to that
described under section 29-2264 or any other procedure to nullify a conviction
other than by pardon.
(d) In addition to the registrable offenses under subdivisions (1)(a),
(b), and (c) of this section, the Sex Offender Registration Act applies to any
person who on or after January 1, 2023:
(i) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found guilty
of human trafficking under subsection (1) or (2) of section 28-831, and the
court determines either by notification of sex offender registration
responsibilities or notation in the sentencing order that the human trafficking
was sex trafficking or sex trafficking of a minor and not solely labor
trafficking or labor trafficking of a minor; or
(ii) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
guilty of any offense that is substantially equivalent to a registrable offense
under subdivision (1)(d)(i) of this section by any village, town, city, state,
territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United States, by the
United States Government, by court-martial or other military tribunal, or by a
foreign jurisdiction, notwithstanding a procedure comparable in effect to that
described under section 29-2264 or any other procedure to nullify a conviction
other than by pardon.
(2) A person appealing a conviction of a registrable offense under this
section shall be required to comply with the act during the appeals process.
Sec. 21. Section 29-4309, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
29-4309 For the purposes of the Sexual Assault Victims' Bill of Rights
Act:
(1)(a) Advocate means:
(i) Any employee or supervised volunteer of a domestic violence and sexual
assault victim assistance program or of any other agency, business, or
organization that is not affiliated with a law enforcement or prosecutor's
office, whose primary purpose is assisting domestic violence and sexual assault
victims. This includes employees or supervised volunteers of an Indian tribe or
a postsecondary educational institution;
(ii) A representative from a victim and witness assistance center as
established in sections 81-1845 to 81-1847 or a similar entity affiliated with
a law enforcement agency or prosecutor's office; or
(iii) An advocate who is employed by a child advocacy center that meets
the requirements of subsection (2) of section 28-728.
(b) If reasonably possible, an advocate shall speak the victim's preferred
language or use the services of a qualified interpreter;
(2) Health care provider means any individual who is licensed, certified,
or registered to perform specified health services consistent with state law;
(3) Sexual assault means a violation of section 28-319, 28-319.01, 28-320,
28-320.01, 28-320.02, 28-322.01, 28-322.02, 28-322.03, 28-322.04, 28-322.05, or
28-703, or section 5 of this act 28-1463.03, sex trafficking or sex trafficking
of a minor under section 28-831, or subdivision (1)(c) or (g) of section 28-386
or subdivision (1)(d), (e), or (f) of section 28-707;
(4) Sexual assault forensic evidence means evidence collected by a health
care provider contained within any sexual assault forensic evidence collection
kit, including a toxicology kit, or any forensic evidence collected by law
enforcement through the course of an investigation; and
(5)(a) Sexual assault victim or victim means any person who is a victim of
sexual assault who reports such sexual assault:
(i) To a health care provider, law enforcement, or an advocate, including
anonymous reporting as provided in section 28-902; and
(ii) In the case of a victim who is under eighteen years of age, to the
Department of Health and Human Services.
(b) Sexual assault victim or victim also includes, if the victim described
in subdivision (5)(a) of this section is incompetent, deceased, or a minor who
is unable to consent to counseling services, such victim's parent, guardian, or
spouse, unless such person is the reported assailant.
Sec. 22. Section 29-4316, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
29-4316 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Criminal justice agency has the same meaning as in section 29-3509;
(b) Sex trafficking means sex trafficking or sex trafficking of a minor in
violation of section 28-831; and
-16-

LB383 LB383
2025 2025
(c) Sexual assault means a violation of section 28-319, 28-319.01, 28-320,
28-320.01, 28-320.02, 28-322.01, 28-322.02, 28-322.03, 28-322.04, 28-322.05, or
28-703, or section 5 of this act 28-1463.03 or subdivision (1)(c) or (g) of
section 28-386 or subdivision (1)(d), (e), or (f) of section 28-707.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, and unless
otherwise required by statute, a criminal justice agency and any attorney
involved in the investigation or prosecution of an alleged sexual assault or
sex trafficking violation shall maintain the confidentiality of the identity
and personal identifying information of the alleged victim. Such information
may be shared by such criminal justice agencies and between such criminal
justice agencies and attorneys as necessary to carry out their duties.
(3) The confidentiality required by subsection (2) of this section does
not apply:
(a) To the extent waived by the alleged victim;
(b) If criminal charges involving the alleged sexual assault or sex
trafficking are filed;
(c) If the victim has died as a result of, or in connection with, the
alleged sexual assault or sex trafficking;
(d) In cases where personal identifying information or the identity of the
victim are released as part of a child abduction alert system used by law
enforcement agencies, such as the AMBER Alert system;
(e) To a person making a report of suspected child abuse or neglect as
required in section 28-711;
(f) To the sharing of reports and information regarding child abuse and
neglect with a child abuse and neglect investigation team or child abuse and
neglect treatment team provided for in section 28-728;
(g) To the Department of Health and Human Services and other assisting
agencies as necessary to carry out their duties in investigations of child
abuse or neglect;
(h) To communication with an individual that an educational entity, as
defined in section 79-1201.01, has designated:
(i) As a Title IX coordinator; or
(ii) To receive reports related to sexual assault or sex trafficking or to
provide supportive measures related to such reports; or
(i) To communication with advocates and health care providers as defined
in section 29-4309.
Sec. 23. Section 83-174.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-174.02 (1) The Department of Correctional Services shall order an
evaluation of the following individuals by a mental health professional to
determine whether or not the individual is a dangerous sex offender:
(a) Individuals who have been convicted of (i) sexual assault of a child
in the first degree pursuant to section 28-319.01 or (ii) sexual assault in the
first degree pursuant to section 28-319;
(b) Individuals who have been convicted of two or more offenses requiring
registration as a sex offender under section 29-4003 if one of the convictions
was for any of the following offenses: (i) Kidnapping of a minor pursuant to
section 28-313, except when the person is the parent of the minor and was not
convicted of any other offense; (ii) sexual assault in the first degree
pursuant to section 28-319 or sexual assault in the second degree pursuant to
section 28-320; (iii) sexual assault of a child pursuant to section 28-320.01;
(iv) sexual assault of a child in the first degree pursuant to section
28-319.01; (v) sexual assault of a child in the second or third degree pursuant
to section 28-320.01; (vi) sexual assault of a vulnerable adult or senior adult
pursuant to subdivision (1)(c) of section 28-386; (vii) incest of a minor
pursuant to section 28-703; (viii) conduct relating to child sexual abuse
material under section 5 of this act visual depiction of sexually explicit
conduct of a child pursuant to section 28-1463.03; or (ix) any offense that is
substantially equivalent to an offense listed in this section by any state,
territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United States, by the
United States Government, or by court-martial or other military tribunal,
notwithstanding a procedure comparable in effect to that described in section
29-2264 or any other procedure to nullify a conviction other than by pardon;
(c) Individuals convicted of a sex offense against a minor who have
refused to participate in or failed to successfully complete the sex offender
treatment program offered by the Department of Correctional Services or the
Department of Health and Human Services during the term of incarceration. The
failure to successfully complete a treatment program due to time constraints or
the unavailability of treatment programming shall not constitute a refusal to
participate in treatment; and
(d) Individuals convicted of failure to comply with the registration
requirements of the Sex Offender Registration Act who have previously been
convicted for failure to comply with the registration requirements of the act
or a similar registration requirement in another state.
(2) The evaluation required by this section shall be ordered at least one
hundred eighty days before the scheduled release of the individual. Upon
completion of the evaluation, and not later than one hundred fifty days prior
to the scheduled release of the individual, the department shall send written
notice to the Attorney General, the county attorney of the county where the
offender is incarcerated, and the prosecuting county attorney. The notice shall
contain an affidavit of the mental health professional describing his or her
findings with respect to whether or not the individual is a dangerous sex
offender.
-17-

LB383 LB383
2025 2025
Sec. 24. Section 84-205, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
84-205 The duties of the Attorney General shall be:
(1) To appear and defend actions and claims against the state;
(2) To investigate, commence, and prosecute any and all actions resulting
from violations of sections 32-1401 to 32-1417;
(3) To consult with and advise the county attorneys, when requested by
them, in all criminal matters and in matters relating to the public revenue. He
or she shall have authority to require aid and assistance of the county
attorney in all matters pertaining to the duties of the Attorney General in the
county of such county attorney and may, in any case brought to the Court of
Appeals or Supreme Court from any county, demand and receive the assistance of
the county attorney from whose county such case is brought;
(4) To give, when required, without fee, his or her opinion in writing
upon all questions of law submitted to him or her by the Governor, head of any
executive department, Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Auditor of Public
Accounts, Board of Educational Lands and Funds, State Department of Education,
Public Service Commission, or Legislature;
(5) At the request of the Governor, head of any executive department,
Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Auditor of Public Accounts, Board of
Educational Lands and Funds, State Department of Education, or Public Service
Commission, to prosecute any official bond or any contract in which the state
is interested which is deposited with any of them and to prosecute or defend
for the state all civil or criminal actions and proceedings relating to any
matter connected with any of such officers' departments if, after
investigation, he or she is convinced there is sufficient legal merit to
justify the proceeding. Such officers shall not pay or contract to pay from the
funds of the state any money for special attorneys or counselors-at-law unless
the employment of such special counsel is made upon the written authorization
of the Governor or the Attorney General;
(6) To enforce the proper application of money appropriated by the
Legislature to the various funds of the state and prosecute breaches of trust
in the administration of such funds;
(7) To prepare, when requested by the Governor, Secretary of State, State
Treasurer, or Auditor of Public Accounts or any other executive department,
proper drafts for contracts, forms, or other writings which may be wanted for
the use of the state and report to the Legislature, whenever requested, upon
any business pertaining to the duties of his or her office. The report
submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted electronically;
(8) To pay all money received, belonging to the people of the state,
immediately upon receipt thereof, into the state treasury;
(9) To keep a record in proper books provided for that purpose at the
expense of the state, a register of all actions and demands prosecuted or
defended by him or her in behalf of the state and all proceedings had in
relation thereto, and deliver the same to his or her successor in office;
(10) To appear for the state and prosecute and defend all civil or
criminal actions and proceedings in the Court of Appeals or Supreme Court in
which the state is interested or a party. When requested by the Governor or the
Legislature, the Attorney General shall appear for the state and prosecute or
defend any action or conduct any investigation in which the state is interested
or a party before any court, officer, board, tribunal, or commission;
(11) To prepare and promulgate model rules of procedure appropriate for
use by as many agencies as possible. The Attorney General shall add to, amend,
or revise the model rules as necessary for the proper guidance of agencies;
(12) To include within the budget of the office sufficient funding to
assure oversight and representation of the State of Nebraska for district court
appeals of administrative license revocation proceedings under section
60-498.04;
(13)(a) To create a Child Protection Division to be staffed by at least
three assistant attorneys general who each have five or more years of
experience in the prosecution or defense of felonies or misdemeanors, including
two years in the prosecution or defense of crimes against children. Upon the
written request of a county attorney, the division shall provide consultation
and advise and assist in the preparation of the trial of any case involving a
crime against a child, including, but not limited to, the following offenses:
(i) Murder as defined in sections 28-303 and 28-304;
(ii) Manslaughter as defined in section 28-305;
(iii) Kidnapping as defined in section 28-313;
(iv) False imprisonment as defined in sections 28-314 and 28-315;
(v) Child abuse as defined in section 28-707;
(vi) Pandering as defined in section 28-802;
(vii) Debauching a minor as defined in section 28-805; and
(viii) Offenses listed in the Child Sexual Abuse Material Prevention Act
or section sections 28-813 , 28-813.01, and 28-1463.03.
(b) Any offense listed in subdivisions (13)(a)(i) through (viii) of this
section shall include all inchoate offenses pursuant to the Nebraska Criminal
Code and compounding a felony pursuant to section 28-301. Such crimes shall not
include matters involving dependent and neglected children, infraction
violations, custody, parenting time, visitation, or other access matters, or
child support. If the county attorney declines in writing to prosecute a case
involving a crime against a child because of an ethical consideration,
including the presence or appearance of a conflict of interest, or for any
other reason, the division shall, upon the receipt of a written request of the
-18-

LB383 LB383
2025 2025
county attorney, the Department of Health and Human Services, the minor child,
the parents of the minor child, or any other interested party, investigate the
matter and either decline to prosecute the matter or initiate the appropriate
criminal proceedings in a court of proper jurisdiction.
(c) For purposes of this subdivision (13), child or children shall mean an
individual or individuals sixteen years of age or younger; and
(14) To enforce the Foreign-owned Real Estate National Security Act.
Sec. 25. Section 87-302, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
87-302 (a) A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in the
course of his or her business, vocation, or occupation, he or she:
(1) Passes off goods or services as those of another;
(2) Causes likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding as to the
source, sponsorship, approval, or certification of goods or services;
(3) Causes likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding as to
affiliation, connection, or association with, or certification by, another;
(4) Uses deceptive representations or designations of geographic origin in
connection with goods or services;
(5) Represents that goods or services have sponsorship, approval,
characteristics, ingredients, uses, benefits, or quantities that they do not
have or that a person has a sponsorship, approval, status, affiliation, or
connection that he or she does not have;
(6) Represents that goods or services do not have sponsorship, approval,
characteristics, ingredients, uses, benefits, or quantities that they have or
that a person does not have a sponsorship, approval, status, affiliation, or
connection that he or she has;
(7) Represents that goods are original or new if they are deteriorated,
altered, reconditioned, reclaimed, used, or secondhand, except that sellers may
repair damage to and make adjustments on or replace parts of otherwise new
goods in an effort to place such goods in compliance with factory
specifications;
(8) Represents that goods or services are of a particular standard,
quality, or grade, or that goods are of a particular style or model, if they
are of another;
(9) Disparages the goods, services, or business of another by false or
misleading representation of fact;
(10) Advertises goods or services with intent not to sell them as
advertised or advertises the price in any manner calculated or tending to
mislead or in any way deceive a person;
(11) Advertises goods or services with intent not to supply reasonably
expectable public demand, unless the advertisement discloses a limitation of
quantity;
(12) Makes false or misleading statements of fact concerning the reasons
for, existence of, or amounts of price reductions;
(13) Uses or promotes the use of or establishes, operates, or participates
in a pyramid promotional scheme in connection with the solicitation of such
scheme to members of the public. This subdivision shall not be construed to
prohibit a plan or operation, or to define a plan or operation as a pyramid
promotional scheme, based on the fact that participants in the plan or
operation give consideration in return for the right to receive compensation
based upon purchases of goods, services, or intangible property by participants
for personal use, consumption, or resale so long as the plan or operation does
not promote or induce inventory loading and the plan or operation implements an
appropriate inventory repurchase program;
(14) With respect to a sale or lease to a natural person of goods or
services purchased or leased primarily for personal, family, household, or
agricultural purposes, uses or employs any referral or chain referral sales
technique, plan, arrangement, or agreement;
(15) Knowingly makes a false or misleading statement in a privacy policy,
published on the Internet or otherwise distributed or published, regarding the
use of personal information submitted by members of the public;
(16) Uses any scheme or device to defraud by means of:
(i) Obtaining money or property by knowingly false or fraudulent
pretenses, representations, or promises; or
(ii) Selling, distributing, supplying, furnishing, or procuring any
property for the purpose of furthering such scheme;
(17) Offers an unsolicited check, through the mail or by other means, to
promote goods or services if the cashing or depositing of the check obligates
the endorser or payee identified on the check to pay for goods or services.
This subdivision does not apply to an extension of credit or an offer to lend
money;
(18) Mails or causes to be sent an unsolicited billing statement, invoice,
or other document that appears to obligate the consumer to make a payment for
services or merchandise he or she did not order;
(19)(i) Installs, offers to install, or makes available for installation
or download a covered file-sharing program on a computer not owned by such
person without providing clear and conspicuous notice to the owner or
authorized user of the computer that files on that computer will be made
available to the public and without requiring intentional and affirmative
activation of the file-sharing function of such covered file-sharing program by
the owner or authorized user of the computer; or
(ii) Prevents reasonable efforts to block the installation, execution, or
disabling of a covered file-sharing program;
-19-

LB383 LB383
2025 2025
(20) Violates any provision of the Nebraska Foreclosure Protection Act;
(21) In connection with the solicitation of funds or other assets for any
charitable purpose, or in connection with any solicitation which represents
that funds or assets will be used for any charitable purpose, uses or employs
any deception, fraud, false pretense, false promise, misrepresentation, unfair
practice, or concealment, suppression, or omission of any material fact;
(22)(i) In the manufacture, production, importation, distribution,
promotion, display for sale, offer for sale, attempt to sell, or sale of a
substance:
(A) Makes a deceptive or misleading representation or designation, or
omits material information, about a substance or fails to identify the contents
of the package or the nature of the substance contained inside the package; or
(B) Causes confusion or misunderstanding as to the effects a substance
causes when ingested, injected, inhaled, or otherwise introduced into the human
body.
(ii) A person shall be deemed to have committed a violation of the Uniform
Deceptive Trade Practices Act for each individually packaged product that is
either manufactured, produced, imported, distributed, promoted, displayed for
sale, offered for sale, attempted to sell, or sold in violation of this
section. A violation under this subdivision (a)(22) shall be treated as a
separate and distinct violation from any other offense arising out of acts
alleged to have been committed while the person was in violation of this
section;
(23)(i) Manufactures, produces, publishes, distributes, monetizes,
promotes, or otherwise makes publicly available any visual depiction of
sexually explicit conduct, any obscene material, or any material that is
harmful to minors in which any person depicted as a participant or observer:
(A) Is under eighteen years of age;
(B) Is a trafficking victim;
(C) Has not expressly and voluntarily consented to such person's
depiction; or
(D) Participated in any act depicted without consent.
(ii) This subdivision (a)(23) does not apply to any telecommunications
service.
(iii) For purposes of this subdivision (a)(23):
(A) Harmful to minors has the same meaning as in 47 U.S.C. 254, as such
section existed on January 1, 2024;
(B) Obscene material has the same meaning as in section 28-807;
(C) Promote means to use any mechanism or publication, or take any action,
that suggests, highlights, advertises, markets, curates, backlinks, hashtags,
or otherwise directs, attempts to direct, or encourages traffic toward specific
materials, including acts carried out affirmatively, through automation,
algorithmically, and via other technical means both known and unknown at this
time;
(D) Publish means to communicate or make information available to another
person via an Internet website, regardless of whether the person consuming,
viewing, or receiving the material gives any consideration for the published
material;
(E) Trafficking victim has the same meaning as in section 28-830;
(F) Visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct has the same meaning as
in section 2 of this act 28-1463.02; and
(G) Without consent has the same meaning as in section 28-318; or
(24) Offers or enters into a right-to-list home sale agreement as defined
in section 81-885.01.
(b) In order to prevail in an action under the Uniform Deceptive Trade
Practices Act, a complainant need not prove competition between the parties.
(c) This section does not affect unfair trade practices otherwise
actionable at common law or under other statutes of this state.
Sec. 26. Sections 26 to 30 of this act shall be known and may be cited as
the Parental Rights in Social Media Act.
Sec. 27. For purposes of the Parental Rights in Social Media Act:
(1) Account holder means a person who, on or after the operative date of
this section, creates an account or profile on a social media platform;
(2) Content includes a text, an image, or a video;
(3) Digitized identification card means a data file that contains all of
the data elements visible on the face and back of a government-issued
operator's license or government-issued identification document and displays
the current status of the license or document;
(4)(a) Interactive computer service means an information service as
defined in 47 U.S.C. 153, an information system, or an information access
software that:
(i) Provides or enables access by multiple users to a computer server; and
(ii) Provides access to the Internet.
(b) An interactive computer service includes an Internet service, an
Internet system, an Internet application, an Internet portal, and a website;
(5) Minor means an individual who is:
(a) Known or reasonably believed by a social media platform to be under
eighteen years of age;
(b) Not emancipated; and
(c) A resident of this state;
(6) Parent means the parent or legal guardian of a minor;
(7) Person means an individual or entity;
(8) Post means content that an account holder makes available on a social
-20-

LB383 LB383
2025 2025
media platform for other account holders and users to view;
(9) Reasonable age verification method includes requiring presentation of
a digitized identification card or any commercially reasonable age verification
method to confirm an individual's age;
(10) Social media company means a person that is an interactive computer
service and that provides a social media platform;
(11)(a) Social media platform means a website or Internet application
that:
(i) Allows a person to create an account; and
(ii) Enables an account holder to communicate with other account holders
and users through posts.
(b) Social media platform does not include:
(i) A broadband Internet access service, as defined in 47 C.F.R. 8.1(b);
(ii) An email service;
(iii) An Internet service, Internet application, or website:
(A) That consists primarily of content that is not generated by account
holders, but rather is preselected by the service, application, or website
provider; and
(B) For which interactive functionality is incidental to, directly related
to, or dependent upon, such preselected content;
(iv) Online shopping, if the interaction with other account holders or
users is predominantly limited to the ability to (A) send, receive, request, or
settle funds, (B) comment on transactions, (C) display goods for sale, (D)
engage as consumers about products and reviews, or (E) post a wish list;
(v) An Internet service, Internet application, or website that primarily
provides career development opportunities;
(vi) A cloud storage or cloud computing service;
(vii) An online service, application, or website in which interaction
between users is predominately (A) used for technical support or (B) limited to
reviewing products offered for sale by means of electronic commerce or
commenting on such reviews posted by other users; or
(viii) Peer-to-peer payment platforms, if the interaction with other users
or account holders is generally limited to the ability to send, receive, or
request funds and to like or comment on such transactions, or other functions
that are focused on sending, receiving, requesting, or settling payments
between users or account holders; and
(12) User means a person who consumes posts on a social media platform but
who is not an account holder.
Sec. 28. (1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a
social media company shall not permit a minor to become an account holder. A
social media platform shall use a reasonable age verification method to verify
the age of an individual seeking to become an account holder on the company's
social media platform. A social media company may use a third-party vendor to
perform such verification.
(b) A social media company or third-party vendor conducting such
verification shall not retain any identifying information of an individual
after verification is complete.
(2) A social media company may allow a minor to become an account holder
if the parent of such minor provides express parental consent authorizing such
minor to become an account holder. A social media company or third-party vendor
shall verify the express parental consent which shall include:
(a) Age verification of the parent through a reasonable age verification
method; and
(b) An oath, affirmation, or form signed by the parent and returned to the
social media company or third-party vendor by common carrier, facsimile, or
electronic scan stating that the consenting adult is the minor user's parent
and authorizes such minor to become an account holder.
(3)(a) Once age and parental consent, if applicable, are verified, the
social media company may permit the minor to become an account holder.
Reverification of an account holder is not required unless parental consent is
revoked by a parent.
(b) A social media company shall develop a method for a parent to revoke
consent for a minor to be an account holder. If consent is revoked, a social
media company shall remove the account of such parent's minor and prohibit such
minor from becoming an account holder until additional express parental consent
is provided.
(4) A social media company shall provide a parent of a minor account
holder with methods for the parent to supervise the minor's account. Such
methods shall include options for the parent to:
(a) View all posts the minor account holder makes under the social media
platform account;
(b) View all responses and messages sent to or by the minor account holder
in the social media platform account;
(c) Control the minor's privacy and account settings; and
(d) Monitor and limit the amount of time the minor account holder spends
using the social media platform.
Sec. 29. (1) A person aggrieved by a violation of section 28 of this act
may bring a civil action against the social media company or third-party vendor
which engaged in the violation to recover such relief as may be appropriate.
(2) In an action under this section, appropriate relief includes:
(a) Such preliminary and other equitable or declaratory relief as may be
appropriate;
(b) Damages under subsection (3) of this section; and
-21-

LB383 LB383
2025 2025
(c) At the discretion of the court, reasonable attorney's fees and other
litigation costs reasonably incurred.
(3)(a) An individual whose information was retained in violation of
subdivision (1)(b) of section 28 of this act may recover actual damages caused
by such violation.
(b) A minor or a parent of such minor aggrieved by any other violation of
section 28 of this act may recover actual damages caused by such violation.
Sec. 30. The Attorney General shall enforce the Parental Rights in Social
Media Act and may impose a penalty of up to two thousand five hundred dollars
per violation. All penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article
VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 31. Sections 26, 27, 28, 29, and 30 of this act become operative on
July 1, 2026. The other sections of this act become operative on their
effective date.
Sec. 32. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect the
validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
Sec. 33. Original sections 25-21,291, 25-21,302, 27-1301, 28-116,
28-320.02, 28-813.02, 28-833, 28-1463.01, 28-1463.02, 28-1463.06, 28-1601,
28-1602, 83-174.02, 84-205, and 87-302, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
and sections 28-813.01, 28-1354, 28-1463.03, 28-1463.05, 28-1701, 29-110,
29-119, 29-4003, 29-4309, and 29-4316, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
Sec. 34. The following section is outright repealed: Section 28-1463.04,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-22-